Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-1403
Applicability of act; election; notice.

The Nebraska Right to Shop Act shall apply to any insurance carrier that elects to be subject to the act. An insurance carrier making such election shall file a notice of the election with the department.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 13.
July 19, 2018